Utah statutes.
59-2-1362.   Certified copy of tax sale record prima facie evidence of regularity.

A copy of the record of any tax sale duly certified by the official custodian of the record at the time of the certificate under the seal of office as a true copy of the entry in the official record showing the sale is prima facie evidence of the facts shown in the record. The regularity of all proceedings connected with the assessment, valuation, notice, equalization, levies, tax notices, advertisement, and sale of property described in the record is presumed, and the burden of showing any irregularity in any of the proceedings resulting in the sale of property for the nonpayment of delinquent taxes shall be on the person who asserts it.

